District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-207.02

Authority to establish.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 702, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 502(g), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 3-207.2.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 502(f) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
See notes to § 4-207.01.